Oklahoma, session 2025, SB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1001, as


amended by Section 8, Chapter 346, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1001), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1001. A. There is hereby levied upon the production of


asphalt, ores bearing lead, zinc, jack and copper a tax equal to


three-fourths of one percent (3/4 of 1%) on the gross value thereof.


B. On or after the effective date of this act July 18, 2018,


and except as provided by paragraph 4 of this subsection, there


shall be levied a tax on the gross value of the production of oil


and gas as follows:



Req. No. 684 Page 1


1. Upon the production of oil a tax equal to seven percent (7%)


of the gross value of the production of oil based on a per barrel


measurement of forty-two (42) U.S. gallons of two hundred thirty-one


(231) cubic inches per gallon, computed at a temperature of sixty


(60) degrees Fahrenheit;


2. Upon the production of gas a tax equal to seven percent (7%)


of the gross value of the production of gas;


3. Notwithstanding the levies in paragraphs 1 and 2 of this


subsection, the production of oil, gas, or oil and gas from wells


spudded prior to the effective date of this act July 18, 2018, and


on or after the effective date of this act July 18, 2018, shall be


taxed at a rate of five percent (5%) commencing with the month of


first production for a period of thirty-six (36) months.


Thereafter, the production shall be taxed as provided in paragraphs


and 2 of this subsection; and


4. If the provisions of Article XIII-C of the Oklahoma


Constitution are approved by the people pursuant to adoption of


State Question No. 795, the rate of gross production tax imposed by


paragraph 3 of this subsection shall be reduced to two percent (2%)


for the first thirty-six (36) months of production and thereafter


the rate of taxation shall be seven percent (7%).


C. The taxes hereby levied shall also attach to, and are levied


on, what is known as the royalty interest, and the amount of such


tax shall be a lien on such interest.

Req. No. 684 Page 2


D. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, for


secondary and tertiary recovery projects approved or having an


initial project start date on or after July 1, 2022, all production


which results from such secondary and tertiary recovery projects


shall be exempt from the gross production tax levied pursuant to


this section for a period not to exceed five (5) years from the


initial project start date or for a period ending upon the


termination of the secondary and tertiary recovery process,


whichever occurs first.


2. For purposes of this subsection, “project start date” means


the date on which the injection of liquids, gases, or other matter


begins on an enhanced recovery project.


3. For new secondary and tertiary recovery projects approved by


the Oklahoma Corporation Commission on or after July 1, 2022, such


approval shall constitute qualification for an exemption.


4. For all production exempted pursuant to this subsection, a


refund against gross production taxes shall be issued as provided in


subsection F of this section.


E. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the production


of oil, gas, or oil and gas from wells drilled but not completed as


of July 1, 2021, which are completed with the use of recycled water


on or after July 1, 2022, shall earn an exemption from the gross


production tax levied from the date of first sales for a period of


twenty-four (24) months. The exemption provided in this subsection

Req. No. 684 Page 3


shall be proportional to the percentage of the total amount of water


used to complete the well that is recycled water. For all


production exempted pursuant to this subsection, a refund against


gross production taxes shall be issued as provided in subsection F


of this section. For purposes of this subsection, “recycled water”


means oil and gas produced water and waste that has been


reconditioned or treated by mechanical or chemical processes into a


reusable form.


F. On or after July 1, 2022, for all oil and gas production


exempt from gross production taxes pursuant to subsections D and E


of this section during a given fiscal year, a refund of gross


production taxes shall be issued to the well operator or a designee


in the amount of such exempted gross production taxes paid during


such period, subject to the following provisions:


1. A refund shall not be claimed until after the end of the


fiscal year. As used in this subsection, a fiscal year shall be


deemed to begin on July 1 of one calendar year and shall end on June


of the subsequent calendar year;


2. Unless otherwise specified, no claims for refunds pursuant


to the provisions of this subsection shall be filed more than


eighteen (18) months after the first day of the fiscal year in which


the refund is first available;


3. Any person claiming a refund pursuant to the exemption


provided in subsections D and E of this section shall file an

Req. No. 684 Page 4


application with the Oklahoma Tax Commission which, upon


determination of qualification by the Corporation Commission, shall


approve the application for such exemption;


4. The Tax Commission may require any person claiming a refund


pursuant to the exemptions provided in subsections D and E of this


section to furnish information or records concerning the exemption


as is deemed necessary by the Tax Commission;


5. No claims for refunds pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be filed by or on behalf of persons other than the


operator or a working interest owner of record at the time of


production;


6. No entity, including subsidiaries of the entity, shall be


authorized to receive refunds claimed pursuant to the exemption


provided in subsection D of this section that exceed twenty percent


(20%) of the limitation provided in paragraph 7 of this subsection;


and


7. The total amount of refunds authorized shall not exceed


Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) pursuant to the exemption


provided in subsection D of this section and Ten Million Dollars


($10,000,000.00) pursuant to the exemption provided in subsection E


of this section for any fiscal year. If the amount of claims for


refunds exceed the limits provided in this paragraph, the Tax


Commission shall determine the percentage of the refund which


establishes the proportionate share of the refund which may be

Req. No. 684 Page 5


claimed by any taxpayer so that the maximum amounts authorized by


this paragraph are not exceeded.


G. On or after July 1, 2022, all persons shall only be entitled


to either the exemption granted pursuant to subsection D or E of


this section for each oil, gas, or oil and gas well drilled or


recompleted in this state. However, any person who qualifies for


the exemption granted pursuant to subsection E of this section shall


not be prohibited from qualification for the exemption granted


pursuant to subsection D of this section if the exemption granted


pursuant to subsection E of this section has expired.


H. 1. Upon the effective date of this act, the production of


oil, gas, or oil and gas used to generate electricity to supply


microgrids shall earn an exemption from fifty percent (50%) of the


gross production tax levied pursuant to subsection B of this


section;


2. For the purposes of this subsection, “microgrid” means a


group of interconnected loads and distributed energy resources


within clearly defined electrical boundaries that acts as a single


controllable entity with respect to the electric grid and can


connect and disconnect from the electric grid to enable the


microgrid to operate in both electric grid-connected mode and non-


grid-connected mode; and


3. For all oil and gas production exempt from the portion of


gross production taxes levied pursuant to this subsection during a

Req. No. 684 Page 6


given fiscal year, a refund of gross production taxes shall be


issued to the well operator or a designee in the amount of the


exempted gross production taxes paid during the period, subject to


the following provisions:


a. a refund shall not be claimed until after the end of


the fiscal year,


b. any person claiming a refund pursuant to the exemption


provided in this subsection shall file an application


with the Tax Commission which, upon determination of


qualification, shall approve the application for the


exemption,


c. the Tax Commission may require any person claiming a


refund pursuant to the exemptions provided in this


subsection to furnish information or records


concerning the exemption as is deemed necessary by the


Tax Commission, and


d. no claims for refunds pursuant to the provisions of


this subsection shall be filed by or on behalf of


persons other than the operator or a working interest


owner of record at the time of production.


I. The Tax Commission shall have the power to require any such


person engaged in mining or the production or the purchase of such


asphalt, mineral ores aforesaid, oil, or gas, or the owner of any


royalty interest therein to furnish any additional information by it

Req. No. 684 Page 7


deemed to be necessary for the purpose of correctly computing the


amount of the tax; and to examine the books, records and files of


such person; and shall have power to conduct hearings and compel the


attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, records and


papers of any person.


I. J. Any person or any member of any firm or association, or


any officer, official, agent or employee of any corporation who


shall fail or refuse to testify; or who shall fail or refuse to


produce any books, records or papers which the Tax Commission shall


require; or who shall fail or refuse to furnish any other evidence


or information which the Tax Commission may require; or who shall


fail or refuse to answer any competent questions which may be put to


him or her by the Tax Commission, touching the business, property,


assets or effects of any such person relating to the gross


production tax imposed by this article or exemption authorized


pursuant to this section or other laws, shall be guilty of a


misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a


fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or


imprisonment in the jail of the county where such offense shall have


been committed, for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine


and imprisonment; and each day of such refusal on the part of such


person shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.


J. K. The Tax Commission shall have the power and authority to


ascertain and determine whether or not any report herein required to

Req. No. 684 Page 8


be filed with it is a true and correct report of the gross products,


and of the value thereof, of such person engaged in the mining or


production or purchase of asphalt and ores bearing minerals


aforesaid and of oil and gas. If any person has made an untrue or


incorrect report of the gross production or value or volume thereof,


or shall have failed or refused to make such report, the Tax


Commission shall, under the rules prescribed by it, ascertain the


correct amount of either, and compute the tax.


K. L. The payment of the taxes herein levied shall be in full,


and in lieu of all taxes by the state, counties, cities, towns,


school districts and other municipalities upon any property rights


attached to or inherent in the right to the minerals, upon producing


leases for the mining of asphalt and ores bearing lead, zinc, jack


or copper, or for oil, or for gas, upon the mineral rights and


privileges for the minerals aforesaid belonging or appertaining to


land, upon the machinery, appliances and equipment used in and


around any well producing oil, or gas, or any mine producing asphalt


or any of the mineral ores aforesaid and actually used in the


operation of such well or mine. The payment of gross production tax


shall also be in lieu of all taxes upon the oil, gas, asphalt or


ores bearing minerals hereinbefore mentioned during the tax year in


which the same is produced, and upon any investment in any of the


leases, rights, privileges, minerals or other property described


herein. Any interest in the land, other than that herein

Req. No. 684 Page 9


enumerated, and oil in storage, asphalt and ores bearing minerals


hereinbefore named, mined, produced and on hand at the date as of


which property is assessed for general and ad valorem taxation for


any subsequent tax year, shall be assessed and taxed as other


property within the taxing district in which such property is


situated at the time.


L. M. No equipment, material or property shall be exempt from


the payment of ad valorem tax by reason of the payment of the gross


production tax except such equipment, machinery, tools, material or


property as is actually necessary and being used and in use in the


production of asphalt or of ores bearing lead, zinc, jack or copper


or of oil or gas. Provided, the exemption shall include the


wellbore and non-recoverable down-hole material, including casing,


actually used in the disposal of waste materials produced with such


oil or gas. It is expressly declared that no ice plants, hospitals,


office buildings, garages, residences, gasoline extraction or


absorption plants, water systems, fuel systems, rooming houses and


other buildings, nor any equipment or material used in connection


therewith, shall be exempt from ad valorem tax.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-684 QD 12/30/2024 11:38:41 PM





Req. No. 684 Page 10